New York, session 2025-2026, A10486.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 604 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended to 2 read as follows: 3 § 604. Reports; contents; preparation; distribution; filing. Reports 4 of accidents required under the preceding section, or under the rules 5 and regulations of the commissioner, shall be upon forms prepared by 6 [him] such commissioner and contain such information as [he] such 7 commissioner shall prescribe; provided, however, such information shall 8 at a minimum include the cost or estimated cost of repairs for any motor 9 vehicle damaged in such accident, or if a motor vehicle involved in such 10 accident incurred no damage then a notation of such fact. Blank forms 11 for such reports shall be printed by the commissioner and a supply sent 12 to all city, town and village clerks and to the chief officer of every 13 city police department for general distribution and use as herein 14 provided. Reports of accidents, required under the preceding section, 15 shall be sent to and filed with the commissioner at the main office of 16 the bureau of motor vehicles in the city of Albany, except as otherwise 17 provided by the rules and regulations of the commissioner. 18 § 2. Section 604 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 19 196 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 20 § 604. Reports; contents; preparation; distribution; filing. Reports 21 of accidents required under sections six hundred three and six hundred 22 three-a of this article, or under the rules and regulations of the 23 commissioner, shall be upon forms prepared by the commissioner and 24 contain such information as the commissioner shall prescribe; provided, 25 however, that the commissioner shall provide space on such forms to 26 indicate the type or types of vehicles involved, including passenger 27 motor vehicles, commercial motor vehicles, motorcycles, limited use 28 motorcycles, off-highway motorcycles, electric scooters, bicycles with EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06433-01-5 A. 10486 2 1 electric assist, and/or bicycles; provided further, however, such infor- 2 mation shall additionally include the cost or estimated cost of repairs 3 for any motor vehicle damaged in such accident, or if a motor vehicle 4 involved in such accident incurred no damage then a notation of such 5 fact. Blank forms for such reports shall be printed by the commissioner 6 and a supply sent to all city, town and village clerks and to the chief 7 officer of every city police department for general distribution and use 8 as herein provided. Reports of accidents, required under the preceding 9 section, shall be sent to and filed with the commissioner at the main 10 office of the bureau of motor vehicles in the city of Albany, except as 11 otherwise provided by the rules and regulations of the commissioner. 12 § 3. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new section 13 607 to read as follows: 14 § 607. Disclosure to motor vehicle condition reporting agencies. 1. 15 The commissioner shall make any information regarding damage and the 16 cost or estimated cost of repairs of such damage or lack of damage 17 incurred by motor vehicles reported pursuant to the provisions of this 18 article available to motor vehicle condition reporting agencies. 19 2. As used in this section, the term "motor vehicle condition report- 20 ing agency" shall have the same meaning as such term is defined in 21 section three hundred ninety-nine-vv of the general business law. 22 § 4. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 399- 23 vv to read as follows: 24 § 399-vv. Motor vehicle condition reporting agencies. 1. As used in 25 this section, the term "motor vehicle condition reporting agency" means 26 any person who, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit 27 basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembl- 28 ing or evaluating motor vehicle maintenance and condition information 29 for the purpose of furnishing reports on the maintenance and condition 30 of a motor vehicle to third parties. 31 2. Every report by a motor vehicle condition reporting agency which 32 includes information regarding an accident a motor vehicle has been 33 involved in shall include the cost or estimated cost of repairs for any 34 damage incurred by such vehicle as a result of such accident, or if no 35 damage was incurred by the motor vehicle as a result of such accident a 36 notation of such fact. 37 § 5. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 38 have become a law; provided, however, that section two of this act shall 39 take effect on the same date and in the same manner as chapter 196 of 40 the laws of 2024, takes effect. Effective immediately, the addition, 41 amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the 42 implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be 43 made and completed on or before such effective date.